Montana, session 2025, LC0013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 70-18-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"70-18-102. Removal of fixture by tenant -- fixed improvement, payment of tax, ownership
judicially resolved. (1) A tenant may remove from the demised premises, any time during the continuance of
the tenant's term, anything affixed to the premises for purposes of trade, manufacture, ornament, or domestic
use if the removal can be effected without injury to the premises unless the thing has, by the manner in which it
is affixed, become an integral part of the premises."
(2) A person who developed a fixed improvement such as a residential home or commercial
building that the person has paid to the county tax assessor state property tax assessments as an improvement
separate from the land tax assessments may have ownership resolved judicially in a partition action or by
adverse possession.

Section 2. Section 76-25-402, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-25-402. Exemptions to subdivision review. (1) The following divisions of land, if made in
substantial compliance with zoning regulations adopted pursuant to Title 76, chapter 25, part 3, are not subject
to the requirements of this chapter:
(a) subject to subsection (2), the creation of four or fewer new lots or parcels, or the creation of
more than four new lots or parcels when the litigants seek recordable lot lines for the land upon which the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0013.1
litigants occupy an improvement and pay taxes assessed on the improvement, from an original lot or parcel:
(i) by order of a court of record in this state;
(ii) by operation of law; or
(iii) that, in the absence of agreement between the parties to a sale, could be created by court
order in this state pursuant to the law of eminent domain, Title 70, chapter 30;
(b) subject to subsection (3), the creation of a lot to provide security for mortgages, liens, or trust
indentures for the purpose of construction, improvements to the land being divided, or refinancing, if the land
that is divided is not conveyed to any entity other than the financial or lending institution to which the mortgage,
lien, or trust indenture was given or to a purchaser upon foreclosure of the mortgage, lien, or trust indenture;
(c) the creation of an interest in oil, gas, minerals, or water that is severed from the surface
ownership of real property;
(d) the creation of cemetery lots;
(e) the reservation of a life estate on a portion of a tract of record;
(f) the lease or rental of a portion of a tract of record for farming and agricultural purposes;
(g) the division of property over which the state does not have jurisdiction;
(h) the creation of rights-of-way or utility sites;
(i) the creation of condominiums, townhomes, townhouses, or conversions, as those terms are
defined in 70-23-102, when any applicable park dedication requirements as set forth in Title 76, chapter 25, part
3, are complied with;
(j) the lease or rental of contiguous airport-related land owned by a city, a county, the state, or a
municipal or regional airport authority;
(k) subject to subsection (4), a division of state-owned land, unless the division creates a second
or subsequent residential parcel from a single tract for sale, rent, or lease after July 1, 1974;
(l) the creation of lots by deed, contract, lease, or other conveyance executed prior to July 1,
1974;
(m) the relocation of common boundary lines between or aggregations of adjoining properties that
does not result in an increase in the number of lots;
(n) a single gift or sale in each county to each member of the landowner's immediate family; or
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0013.1
(o) subject to subsection (5), the creation of lots by deed, contract, lease, or other conveyance in
which the landowner enters into a covenant with the governing body that runs with the land that provides that
the divided land must be used exclusively for agricultural purposes.
(2) Before a court of record orders a division of land under subsection (1)(a), the court shall notify
the governing body of the pending division and allow the governing body to present written comment on the
division.
(3) A transfer of divided land by the owner of the property at the time that the land was divided to
any party other than those identified in subsection (1)(b) subjects the division of land to the requirements of this
chapter.
(4) Instruments of transfer of land that is acquired for state highways may refer by parcel and
project number to state highway plans that have been recorded in compliance with 60-2-209 and are exempted
from the surveying and platting requirements of this chapter. If the parcels are not shown on highway plans of
record, instruments of transfer of the parcels must be accompanied by and refer to appropriate certificates of
survey and plats when presented for recording.
(5) The governing body, in its discretion, may revoke the covenant provided for in subsection (1)(o)
without subdivision review if the original lot lines are restored through aggregation of the covenanted land prior
to or in conjunction with the revoking of the covenant."
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****